Linux/l10n/ispell/ukrainian.dict
вагранка/A
вакцина/A
валер╕анка/A
ванта/A
ватерл╕н╕я/A
вахта/A
ведмежатина/A
великомучениця/A
вентиляц╕я/A
вертихв╕стка/A
вербичка/A
вуглекислота/A
вулканолог╕я/A
вигадка/A
вичинка/A
вилиця/A
вимога/A
висадка/A
висотка/A
вишивка/A
виб╕рниця/A
в╕втар/B
в╕дгадка/A
в╕деокамера/A
в╕длипана/A
в╕дплата/A
в╕дзнака/A
в╕йськл╕кар/B
в╕льха/A
в╕с╕мка/A
в╕за/A
в╕зир/B
в╕брац╕я/A
владар/B
впадинка/A
втеча/A
в'язанка/A
водянка/A
вольниця/A
володар/B
волосинка/A
воротар/B
воротарка/A
вошка/A
гадина/A
гальванотехн╕ка/A
галерея/A
ганьба/A
гармон╕зац╕я/A
гастролювала/A
гегемон╕я/A
генетика/A
геро╖ня/A
геодез╕я/A
геотектон╕ка/A
гульв╕са/A
гумка/A
губа/A
гиря/A
г╕дратцелюлоза/A
г╕дроенергетика/A
г╕дросфера/A
г╕льза/A
г╕неколог╕я/A
г╕пербол╕зац╕я/A
г╕рчиця/A
г╕╓на/A
глухар/B
глина/A
гносеолог╕я/A
графолог╕я/A
граната/A
гребля/A
групка/A
гримаса/A
гряда/A
гроза/A
годинникар/B
голгофа/A
головешка/A
головл╕кар/B
гом╕лка/A
гончар/B
гора/A
горбуша/A
государ/B
господар/B
гострота/A
факторизац╕я/A
фантасмагор╕я/A
фарба/A
фем╕н╕стка/A
фуфайка/A
ф╕гуристка/A
ф╕лател╕я/A
ф╕сгармон╕я/A
ф╕з╕отерап╕я/A
флюоресценц╕я/A
француженка/A
фрикаделька/A
форма/A
фотовиставка/A
фотол╕тограф╕я/A
фотох╕м╕я/A
Запор╕жжя/A
жердина/A
журнал╕стка/A
житниця/A
жриця/A
авар╕я/A
ав╕арозв╕дка/A
автокатастрофа/A
автоном╕я/A
автослюсар/B
автостоянка/A
агава/A
агрес╕я/A
афганка/A
адгез╕я/A
адм╕н╕страц╕я/A
аерофотограф╕я/A
ауд╕╓нц╕я/A
акватор╕я/A
акцепц╕я/A
акселератка/A
акторка/A
альтанка/A
алерг╕я/A
аллотроп╕я/A
амальгама/A
ам╕лаза/A
ампл╕туда/A
анг╕на/A
анафаза/A
анатом╕я/A
анестез╕олог╕я/A
античастинка/A
антраша/A
анон╕мка/A
апл╕катура/A
аптекар/B
апоплекс╕я/A
арена/A
ар╕я/A
артикуляц╕я/A
арх╕тектура/A
асигнац╕я/A
астен╕я/A
астронавтика/A
атрибуц╕я/A
азотобактер╕я/A
абракадабра/A
абхазка/A
дворняжка/A
дактилоскоп╕я/A
дев'яноста/A
деф╕бриляц╕я/A
декада/A
демагог╕я/A
деморал╕зац╕я/A
депрес╕я/A
держсекретар/B
дестаб╕л╕зац╕я/A
дезинформац╕я/A
дебаеграма/A
дудар/B
думка/A
дублерша/A
дифракц╕я/A
дилатац╕я/A
димар/B
дипломатика/A
дисертац╕я/A
дискотека/A
диссипац╕я/A
дитинча/A
д╕вчина/A
д╕адема/A
д╕рка/A
Ел╕ста/A
драп╕ровка/A
дружба/A
друкар/B
др╕бнота/A
дзвонар/B
дзига/A
довбня/A
документац╕я/A
дом╕шка/A
домогосподар/B
доп╕зна/A
досуха/A
доярка/A
╢вгена/A
еволюц╕я/A
еклога/A
експедиц╕я/A
екстракц╕я/A
економ╕я/A
електрог╕тара/A
електролюм╕несценц╕я/A
електропраска/A
електробритва/A
емульс╕я/A
ендокринолог╕я/A
ентомолог╕я/A
еп╕зоот╕я/A
ерудиц╕я/A
еспланада/A
етимолог╕я/A
щеб╕нка/A
щ╕точка/A
увага/A
Феодос╕я/A
указка/A
Флоренц╕я/A
упаковка/A
упир/B
ус╕кла/A
утил╕зац╕я/A
узурпац╕я/A
чалма/A
частинка/A
чемп╕онка/A
черепиця/A
чехарда/A
читальня/A
чотириста/A
чоботар/B
╤нна/A
╤тал╕я/A
цвинтар/B
цар/B
цементац╕я/A
цезар/B
цебра/A
цикада/A
цитата/A
ц╕лина/A
Африка/A
Бугульма/A
Ал╕на/A
Ангел╕на/A
Антарктика/A
Аз╕я/A
╕грашка/A
╕дил╕я/A
╕кона/A
╕мунолог╕я/A
╕мплантац╕я/A
╕нвентар/B
╕нфанта/A
╕нформатизац╕я/A
╕ндичка/A
╕нкв╕зиц╕я/A
╕нсталяц╕я/A
╕нтерференц╕я/A
╕нтриганка/A
╕ржа/A
╕стер╕я/A
╕╓рарх╕я/A
╕зобара/A
Йокогама/A
Канберра/A
Куба/A
Колумб╕я/A
квадратура/A
квасоля/A
кв╕тникар/B
квочка/A
кафедра/A
калькуляц╕я/A
календар/B
калориметр╕я/A
камея/A
канарка/A
канон╕зац╕я/A
каплиця/A
кард╕о╖да/A
карта/A
картотека/A
каста/A
катапульта/A
каторжанка/A
казкар/B
каюта/A
кельнерка/A
кесар/B
кувалда/A
кульбаба/A
купа/A
купюра/A
курка/A
кустар/B
кушетка/A
кухар/B
киця/A
кишеня/A
к╕мнатка/A
к╕ноартистка/A
к╕нопл╕вка/A
к╕нохрон╕ка/A
к╕стка/A
клав╕атура/A
клема/A
кл╕тинка/A
клятва/A
княгиня/A
крамар/B
крамола/A
крейда/A
кривизна/A
криниця/A
криза/A
криоскоп╕я/A
кропива/A
ковтка/A
коалесценц╕я/A
колгоспниця/A
кол╕сниця/A
колода/A
колотнеча/A
комар/B
коментар/B
комуна/A
компенсац╕я/A
компонента/A
конверс╕я/A
конфронтац╕я/A
конина/A
консервац╕я/A
конструкц╕я/A
контратака/A
контора/A
копуха/A
коректура/A
корчмар/B
корида/A
королева/A
коса/A
косар/B
космограф╕я/A
котлета/A
козир/B
кооперац╕я/A
лавка/A
лактоза/A
Ман╕ла/A
Мар╕я/A
латка/A
льотчиця/A
легкоатлетка/A
ледар/B
лейкопластир/B
лексика/A
леб╕дка/A
лижня/A
липучка/A
лихвар/B
л╕врея/A
л╕ценз╕я/A
л╕кар/B
л╕м╕тац╕я/A
л╕ра/A
л╕тера/A
л╕хтар/B
ляда/A
люлька/A
ложа/A
Молдав╕я/A
лосиха/A
Наварра/A
магнез╕я/A
магн╕тострикц╕я/A
мачула/A
македонка/A
малага/A
мамця/A
манера/A
мансарда/A
мар╕онетка/A
маршрутизац╕я/A
мастурбац╕я/A
матер╕я/A
мазанина/A
Нева/A
медицина/A
мел╕орац╕я/A
мензурка/A
месниця/A
металограф╕я/A
метелиця/A
методика/A
Небраска/A
мультипл╕кац╕я/A
мускулатура/A
мигалка/A
митниця/A
м╕жвузловина/A
м╕кроелектрон╕ка/A
м╕крохвиля/A
Н╕меччина/A
м╕н╕атюра/A
м╕стер╕я/A
м╕шалка/A
м'ята/A
модуляц╕я/A
мокрота/A
монарх╕стка/A
монастир/B
монопол╕зац╕я/A
морена/A
мостина/A
мошва/A
нагайка/A
нафтобаза/A
надбудова/A
нац╕онал╕зац╕я/A
наливка/A
наперстянка/A
наречена/A
насм╕шка/A
натуга/A
назавтра/A
нашатир/B
невдача/A
невролог╕я/A
нед╕ля/A
неустойка/A
непманша/A
неспод╕ванка/A
небеса/A
нум╕зматика/A
н╕г╕л╕стка/A
н╕мота/A
Океан╕я/A
Олена/A
новац╕я/A
ноч╕вля/A
ностальг╕я/A
пава/A
Ра╖са/A
палуба/A
панацея/A
панцир/B
пантера/A
пара/A
парусина/A
парочка/A
пастила/A
пастир/B
пазуха/A
печериця/A
пекар/B
пемза/A
перевага/A
передача/A
переуступка/A
перемога/A
перере╓страц╕я/A
перезастава/A
перукар/B
перипет╕я/A
персона/A
першодрукар/B
петиц╕я/A
пуща/A
пустеля/A
пустир/B
пузир/B
пухир/B
публ╕цистика/A
письменниця/A
писар/B
п╕встакана/A
п╕дгрупа/A
п╕дкова/A
п╕дмножина/A
п╕дробка/A
п╕дстилка/A
п╕дозра/A
п╕люля/A
п╕р'╖нка/A
п╕скар/B
п╕слязавтра/A
плавбаза/A
пластина/A
пластир/B
плашка/A
плитка/A
пл╕ткар/B
плювальниця/A
правда/A
практика/A
прем╕я/A
пружина/A
приказка/A
прим╕тка/A
приправа/A
призв╕дниця/A
пряжка/A
провокац╕я/A
проф╕лактика/A
процедура/A
прокрутка/A
проноза/A
пророчиця/A
протекц╕я/A
проходка/A
пробо╖на/A
псалтир/B
псар/B
психолог╕я/A
п'╓зоелектрика/A
п'ятниця/A
пов╕я/A
поводир/B
погоня/A
подруга/A
поетика/A
покора/A
пол╕граф╕я/A
пол╕теконом╕я/A
половинка/A
помпа/A
поправка/A
порцеляна/A
пороша/A
пос╕пака/A
поступка/A
поземка/A
пошта/A
рад╕ограф╕я/A
рад╕олюм╕несценц╕я/A
рад╕отерап╕я/A
рац╕онал╕зац╕я/A
Самара/A
раса/A
реверс╕я/A
регата/A
рефрактометр╕я/A
редька/A
рейка/A
рекомб╕нац╕я/A
репетиц╕я/A
резекц╕я/A
руда/A
Суматра/A
рицар/B
ритм╕ка/A
р╕чка/A
Соф╕я/A
розв╕дслужба/A
розм╕тка/A
розстановка/A
свинарка/A
святиня/A
сама/A
самооборона/A
сардина/A
сейсмолог╕я/A
секретар/B
сем╕отика/A
сес╕я/A
суперпозиц╕я/A
субл╕мац╕я/A
симетр╕я/A
сировина/A
с╕льниця/A
скатертина/A
скриня/A
скотар/B
служба/A
слюсар/B
смужка/A
спаржа/A
спинка/A
сповна/A
стара/A
стежинка/A
ступня/A
страйкар/B
стратосфера/A
стюардеса/A
сова/A
сомнамбула/A
тварина/A
тактика/A
табуретка/A
телекамера/A
температура/A
тераса/A
тетралог╕я/A
туркеня/A
тисяча/A
трагед╕я/A
траса/A
трунар/B
тривога/A
трясовина/A
тягар/B
товкучка/A
токар/B
торговка/A
звичка/A
завидна/A
задача/A
заковичка/A
замм╕н╕стра/A
зарплата/A
затримка/A
здоба/A
з╕ниця/A
злодюжка/A
знахар/B
зневага/A
золотар/B
зоря/A
Д╕ма/A
янтар/B
яшма/A
шарада/A
шахтар/B
шина/A
шинкар/B
шкура/A
шпаргалка/A
шовковиця/A
хвала/A
хата/A
хабар/B
хустка/A
хмарка/A
холка/A
балаганщина/A
бал╕стика/A
баргузина/A
баронеса/A
базука/A
бельг╕йка/A
бест╕я/A
безстидниця/A
буквар/B
букса/A
бунтар/B
бурулька/A
бистрина/A
б╕лила/A
б╕тум╕зац╕я/A
б╕бл╕отекар/B
б╕омехан╕ка/A
блискавка/A
бляхар/B
бретелька/A
бризка/A
бюрократ╕я/A
богатир/B
болячка/A
бондар/B
бородавка/A
овочер╕зка/A
од╕ссея/A
океанограф╕я/A
ондатра/A
оправа/A
Прага/A
орендар/B
ортопед╕я/A
отаманщина/A
об╕цянка/A
обнова/A
Пол╕на/A
